Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 13 Legacies, Devises, and Inheritance

33-13-1.
Notice of devise or bequest to corporation or association.

Within ninety (90) days after the admission to probate of any will containing a devise or bequest to any corporation or voluntary association, the executor or administrator or other estate fiduciary shall mail by certified mail return receipt requested, a written notice of the devise or bequest directed to the devisee or legatee at the place where it is located, if the same is known. An affidavit of notice together with the return receipt shall be filed in the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 864; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-1

; P.L. 2006, ch. 335, § 1.

33-13-2.
Order for conversion of personalty into cash and distribution.

If the estate of a deceased person is to be distributed in whole or in part, the probate court, upon the petition of any person interested, after any notice as it may direct, may order the executor or administrator to convert the personal property into cash and to distribute the cash among the persons entitled to receive it.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1005; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-2

.

33-13-3.
Restrictions on power of heir or devisee to incumber or alien realty.

No heir or devisee of a deceased person shall have power, within two (2) years and six (6) months after the first publication of the notice of the qualification of the first executor or administrator on the estate of the deceased person, to incumber or alien the real estate of the deceased so as to prevent or affect the sale of the real estate by the executor or administrator, if necessary, as prescribed by law; provided, however, unless otherwise directed by will or codicil, that after the expiration of the period of two (2) years and six (6) months from the date of first publication, without any deduction of time when there was no representative of the estate, the heir or devisee may alien or incumber the real estate, and the real estate shall not be chargeable with any lien for the debts of the deceased.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 994; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-3

.

33-13-4.
Rights of creditors and heirs where no administration granted.

Any creditor or creditors of any deceased person who shall have died intestate, being seised at the time of his or her death of real estate within the state, and upon whose estate no letters of administration shall have been taken, shall be forever barred from collecting their claim or claims against the estate of such deceased person, unless they shall, within the period of six (6) years of the death of the person, petition the probate court having jurisdiction for letters of administration upon the estate; and the heirs of the deceased person may alien or incumber the real estate freed from the claim of all creditors after the period of six (6) years shall have elapsed without a petition having been filed as provided in this section; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the right of any creditor to satisfy his or her claim from any security held by him or her.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 318, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1914, ch. 1099, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-4

.

33-13-5.
Payment of legacy on giving of indemnity bond.

When an executor or administrator, after having given bond for the discharge of his or her trust, is requested by a legatee to make payment in whole or in part of a legacy, the probate court, if the executor or administrator consents, may require that the legatee shall first give bond to the executor or administrator, with surety or sureties to be approved by the court, and conditioned to refund the amount to be paid, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy any demands that may be afterwards recovered against the estate of the deceased, and so indemnify the executor or administrator against all other loss and damage on account of the payment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 976; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 11; P.L. 1951, ch. 2744, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-5

.

33-13-6.
Filing of statement listing legatees — Notice.

An executor may, and for cause shown shall, file within two (2) years after the date of the first publication, or any further time as the probate court may allow, and at the time during the periods as the court may direct, a statement in the office of the clerk of the probate court setting out the names of the legatees, the amounts to be paid, and the property to be turned over to them respectively, or to be held by himself or herself as trustee. Notice of the filing of the statement and of the time and place fixed by the court for hearing on the statement shall be given by advertisement at least twice each week for two (2) successive weeks in some newspaper, as ordered by the court. The probate clerk shall also give notice by registered or certified mail to all persons interested whose post office addresses are known.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 978; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 13; P.L. 1910, ch. 584, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-6

.

33-13-7.
Approval of statement listing legatees — Order to pay legacies.

Upon a hearing on the statement, the court shall approve the statement as filed, or shall amend and approve the same as amended, and shall enter its order directing the payment and satisfaction of the legacies. If an appeal is taken, the probate court may order the payment and satisfaction of legacies not affected by the appeal.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 979; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-7

.

33-13-8.
Determination of questions as to legacies.

Whenever any question arises as to the identity of a legatee, or the construction, or the payment and satisfaction of any legacy, the probate court, upon petition setting out any questions, after notice by citation to all known parties and any additional notice the court may direct, and after a hearing thereon, may determine the questions and enter its order accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 980; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-8

.

33-13-8.1.
Distributions in kind in satisfaction of pecuniary bequests.

As used in this section, the terms “pecuniary bequests” and “transfer in trust of a pecuniary amount” mean, respectively, a bequest in a will or a transfer under a trust agreement of a specific amount of money, which amount is either expressly stated in the instrument or determinable by means of a formula which is stated in the instrument.

Whether a bequest or transfer in trust is pecuniary in character depends upon the intention of the testator or grantor.

Where a will or a trust agreement authorizes the executor, administrator, or trustee (hereinafter called the “fiduciary”) to satisfy wholly or partly in kind a pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust of a pecuniary amount, unless the instrument shall otherwise expressly provide, the assets selected by the fiduciary for that purpose shall be valued at their respective values on the date or dates of their distribution.

Where a will or a trust agreement authorizes the fiduciary to satisfy wholly or partly in kind a pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust of a pecuniary amount and the instrument requires the fiduciary to value the assets selected by the fiduciary for distribution as of a date other than the date or dates of their distribution, unless the instrument shall otherwise expressly provide, the assets selected by the fiduciary for that purpose, together with any cash distributed, shall have an aggregate value on the date or dates of their distribution amounting to no less than, and to the extent practicable to no more than, the amount of the bequest or transfer in trust as stated in, or determined by the formula stated in, the instrument.

History of Section.

G.L., §

33-13-8.1

, as enacted by P.L. 1969, ch. 241, § 1.

33-13-9.
Action for recovery of legacy — Action to preserve lien or charge upon real estate.

A legatee may recover his or her legacy in a civil action; but no action shall be brought for recovery against an executor or administrator with the will annexed, for the recovery of a legacy, until the executor or administrator has filed a statement of the legacies to be paid under the provisions of §

33-13-6

or failed to comply with the provisions of §

33-13-6

.

All actions to impress and preserve a lien or charge upon real estate based upon a will duly proven after May 28, 1959, wherein real estate is subject to a lien or charge expressed or implied, shall be commenced and sued within six (6) years from the date the will is proven or the right accrues and not later; and all actions to impress and preserve a lien or charge upon real estate based upon a will duly proven prior to May 28, 1959, wherein real estate is subject to a lien or charge expressed or implied, shall be commenced and sued within six (6) years from May 28, 1959, or if on the effective date the right to sue shall not have accrued, then within six (6) years of the time when the right to sue shall have accrued, and not later; and in any event any such lien or charge shall be wholly lost unless notice of the suit shall be filed in the land records of the city or town where the real estate lies within ten (10) days of the commencement of the suit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 977; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-9

; P.L. 1959, ch. 115, § 1.

33-13-10.
Action for an accounting brought by residuary legatee.

An executor, being a residuary legatee, may bring an action for an accounting against his or her co-executor concerning the estate in his or her hands, and for his or her part thereof, and every other residuary legatee shall have the like remedy against an executor or administrator with the will annexed; but in both cases without prejudice to any other remedies.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 981; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-10

.

33-13-11.
Time when order of distribution allowed.

At any time after six (6) months from the date of the first publication of the notice of the qualification of the first administrator, a probate court may make an order of distribution, if it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court that the administrator has paid all claims that have been filed and allowed or proved.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 982; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 17; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-11

.

33-13-12.
Time when order of distribution required.

Within two (2) years after the first publication, or such further time as the probate court for cause shown may allow, administrators shall obtain an order of distribution, ascertaining the distributees and the proportion of the personal estate due each.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 983; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-12

.

33-13-13.
Payment of money into court for benefit of foreign legatee or distributee.

Where it shall appear that a legatee or distributee resides outside of the United States or its territories and would not have the benefit, use, or control of the money, or other property due him or her, the probate court may direct that the money or other property be paid into the registry of the probate court for the benefit of the legatee or distributee or the person or persons as may thereafter appear to be entitled thereto. Any money or other property so paid into court shall be paid out only by special order of the probate court or pursuant to the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 579, § 11, as enacted by P.L. 1951, ch. 2744, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-13

.

33-13-14.
Liability of heirs, next of kin, devisees, and legatees for debts.

After the settlement of an estate by an executor or administrator, and after the expiration of six (6) months from the date of the first publication of the notice of his or her qualification by the first executor or administrator, the heirs, next of kin, devisees, and legatees of the deceased shall be liable, in the manner provided in the following sections, for all debts for which suits could not have been brought against the executor or administrator and for which provision is not made under the preceding sections of this chapter or chapters 11 and 12 of this title.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 984; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 19; P.L. 1939, ch. 706, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-14

.

33-13-15.
Action by creditor against heirs, next of kin, devisees, and legatees.

Any creditor holding a contingent claim, the right of action on which did not accrue during the period of six (6) months, who shall bring his or her action within one year after his or her right of action accrues, and any creditor who from accident, mistake or other cause has failed to file his or her claim within six (6) months after the first publication of notice who shall bring his or her action not later than three (3) years after the first publication, may recover his or her claim against the heirs and next of kin of the deceased, or against the devisees and legatees under his or her will, each one of whom shall be liable to the creditor to an amount not exceeding the value of real or personal estate that he or she has received from the deceased. But, if by the will of the deceased any part of his or her estate, or any one or more of the devisees or legatees, is made exclusively liable for the claim in exoneration of the residue of the estate or of other devisees or legatees, those provisions of the will shall be complied with and the persons and estates so exempted shall be liable for only so much of the claims as cannot be recovered from those who are first chargeable therewith.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 985; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 20; P.L. 1939, ch. 706, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-15

.

33-13-16.
Liability of estate of heir, next of kin, devisee, or legatee for creditor’s claim.

If an heir, next of kin, devisee, or legatee dies, without having paid his or her just proportion of the claim, his or her estate shall be liable therefor, as for his or her own debt, to the extent to which he or she would have been liable if living.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 986; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-16

.

33-13-17.
Recovery of creditors’ claims — Apportionment of liability.

In a case under §§

33-13-15

and

33-13-16

, the creditor shall recover his or her claim by a civil action against all persons so liable, or against any of them as are within reach of process. The court shall decide how much each one of the defendants is liable to pay towards the claim.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 987; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-17

.

33-13-18.
Failure of creditor to join all defendants — Addition of parties.

An action under §§

33-13-15

and

33-13-16

shall not be dismissed or barred for not making all persons who might have been so included defendants; but, in any stage of the cause, the court, upon terms as may be deemed reasonable, may summon in other parties and allow amendments as may be necessary.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 988; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-18

.

33-13-19.
Liability to creditor for amount payable by insolvent heir, devisee or other — Restriction to amount received from estate.

If an heir, devisee or other person who was originally liable with others for the claim is insolvent, unable to pay his or her proportion thereof, or beyond reach of process, the others shall be liable to the creditor for the whole amount of his or her claim; but no one shall be compelled to pay more than the amount received by him or her from the estate of the deceased.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 989; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-19

.

33-13-20.
Indemnity between heirs, next of kin, legatees, and devisees.

If, in consequence of insolvency, absence, or other cause, a person liable for a claim fails to pay his or her just proportion of the claim to the creditor, he or she shall be liable to indemnify all who pay more than their just proportion of the claim. This indemnity may be recovered at their election by all of them jointly, or in separate proceedings by one or more of them for his, hers, or their parts respectively.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 990; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-13-20

.